Hawaii statutes.
§431:11-109 Rules and regulations. The
commissioner may, upon notice and opportunity for all interested persons to be
heard, issue such rules and orders as shall be necessary to carry out the
provisions of this article. [L 1987, c 349, pt of §8]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next